Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB368.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 424.145 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Local government" means any:
1. [Any ]Urban-county government;
2. [Any ]Consolidated local government;
3. [Any ]Charter county;
4. [Any ]Unified local government;[ and]
5. [In any ]County;
6. City[ containing a population of eighty thousand (80,000) or more based
upon the most recent federal decennial census, the county itself or any:
a. City within the county];
7.[b.] Special district[ within the county];
8.[c.] School district[ within the county]; and[or]
9.[d.] Special purpose governmental entity[ within the county]; and
(b) "Notice website" means a website that is maintained by a local government or
a third party under contract with the local government, which contains links to
the legal advertisements or notices electronically published by the local
government.
(2) Local governments may satisfy the requirements of this chapter or any other
provision of law requiring the publication of an advertisement in a newspaper by
following the alternative procedures established in this section.
(3) In lieu of newspaper publication, a local government may post the required
advertisement online on a notice website operated by the local government that is
accessible to the public at all times in accordance with subsections (4) to (9) of this
section. A special purpose governmental entity or special district that does not
Page 1 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
maintain a website may post the required advertisement on a notice website
operated by the local government that established the special purpose
governmental entity or special district. Publication of an advertisement shall be
deemed to have occurred on the date the advertisement is posted on the local
government's notice website.
(4) (a) In conjunction with an alternative internet posting, the local government shall
publish a newspaper advertisement one (1) time providing notice that the
public may view the full advertisement on the notice website. The newspaper
advertisement shall:
1. Be not more than six (6) column inches and meet the technical
requirements of KRS 424.160(1);
2. Be submitted by the local government to the newspaper in a timely
manner to ensure publication occurs[published] within ten (10) days of
the alternative posting on the notice website when the purpose of the
posting is to inform the public of a completed act, including those acts
specified in KRS 424.130(1)(a), or within three (3) days of the posting
when the purpose of the posting is to inform the public of the right to
take a certain action, including the events specified in KRS
424.130(1)(b) and (d);
3. Inform the public of the subject matter of the alternative posting, inform
the public of its right to inspect any documents associated with the
internet posting by contacting the local government, and provide a
mailing and a physical address where a copy of the document may be
obtained and the web address if the document is available online; and
4. Provide the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the notice website
address and the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the address
where the full advertisement may be directly viewed along with a
Page 2 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
telephone number for the local government.
(b) A local government may, alternatively, publish an advertisement one (1) time
providing notice that the public may view the full advertisement on the notice
website in a digital newspaper that meets the qualifications discussed in KRS
424.120, so long as the advertisement complies with paragraph (a)2.[(a) 2.],
3., and 4. of this subsection.
(5) In addition to specific legal requirements applicable to a particular type of
advertisement:
(a) The contents of each alternative internet posting shall meet the minimum
requirements of KRS 424.140; and
(b) The local government shall make the alternative internet posting in
accordance with the times and periods established by KRS 424.130, and shall
actively maintain the alternative internet posting on its public website:
1. Until the deadline passes or the event occurs if the substance of the
advertisement is intended to advise the public of a time to take action or
the occurrence of a future event;
2. For at least ninety (90) days if the substance of the advertisement is to
inform the public of an action taken by the local government, such as the
enactment of an ordinance; or
3. For one (1) year or until updated or replaced with a more recent version
if the substance of the advertisement is intended to inform the public
about the financial status of the local government, such as annual audits
or the budget.
(6) The local government shall display access to any and all alternative internet
postings made pursuant to this section prominently on the homepage or first page of
the notice website. The section of the notice website containing any postings and
the actual advertisement shall be made in a manner where the public can readily and
Page 3 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
with minimal effort identify the location of and easily retrieve the advertisements.
(7) The local government shall provide a conspicuous statement on its notice website
that individuals who have difficulty in accessing the contents of posted
advertisements may contact the local government for information regarding
alternative methods of accessing advertisements, which shall include the telephone
number of the local government.
(8) As proof of an alternative internet posting to satisfy any newspaper publication
requirement, the local government shall memorialize the posting by capturing the
posting in electronic or paper format and shall complete an affidavit signed by the
person responsible for causing publications under KRS 424.150, stating that the
local government satisfied the publication requirement by alternative internet
posting. The affidavit shall specify the active dates of the notice website posting,
the specific statutory requirements being satisfied by the alternative internet
posting, and the notice website address where the alternative posting was located,
including the full Uniform Resource Locator (URL) used for the posting. The local
government shall retain the captured posting and the affidavit by the person
responsible for publication for a period of three (3) years. Together, the captured
posting and the affidavit shall constitute prima facie evidence that the posting was
made and occurred as stated within the affidavit.
(9) The failure to cause the newspaper advertisement required in subsection (4) of this
section shall not void the action of the local government or negate the enforceability
of the matter advertised by alternative internet posting. Any person who violates the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section shall be subject to the penalties
provided in KRS 424.990.
(10) Any local government using the alternative procedures established in this section
shall also, at the time it submits the advertisement required under subsection (4)
of this section, submit the contents of the full advertisement to the newspaper or
Page 4 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
digital newspaper. The local government shall clearly indicate that it is using the
alternative procedures established in this section and is submitting the full
advertisement for general information purposes. The newspaper or digital
newspaper may choose to publish the full advertisement but shall not charge the
local government if it does so.
Section 2. KRS 68.245 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The property valuation administrator shall submit an official estimate of real and
personal property and new property assessment as defined in KRS 132.010, to the
county judge/executive by April 1 of each year.
(2) No county fiscal court shall levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which
may be levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant
to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon such tax by the
voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010, until the taxing district has complied with the provisions of subsection (5)
of this section.
(3) The state local finance officer shall certify to each county judge/executive, by June
30 of each year, the following:
(a) The compensating tax rate, as defined in KRS 132.010, and the amount of
revenue expected to be produced by it;
(b) The tax rate which will produce no more revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%) over the
amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010 and the amount of revenue expected to be produced by it.
(4) Real and personal property assessment and new property determined in accordance
with KRS 132.010 shall be certified to the state local finance officer by the
Department of Revenue upon completion of action on property assessment data.
(5) (a) A county fiscal court, proposing to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax
Page 5 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
rate which may be levied at the request of a county community improvement
district pursuant to KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote
upon the tax by the voters of that county, which exceeds the compensating tax
rate defined in KRS 132.010, shall hold a public hearing to hear comments
from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in
the principal office of the taxing district, or, in the event the taxing district has
no office, or the office is not suitable for a hearing, the hearing shall be held in
a suitable facility as near as possible to the geographic center of the district.
(b) County fiscal courts of counties containing a city of the first class proposing
to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be levied at the
request of a county community improvement district pursuant to KRS
107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon the tax by the voters of
that county, which exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010, shall hold three (3) public hearings to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearings shall be held in three (3)
separate locations; each location shall be determined by dividing the county
into three (3) approximately equal geographic areas, and identifying a suitable
facility as near as possible to the geographic center of each area.
(c) The county fiscal court shall advertise the hearing by causing to be published
at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of largest
circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than twelve
(12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
Page 6 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearings which shall be held not less
than seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21)[ten (10)] days, after
the day that the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(d) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his residence or principal place
of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(e) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The county fiscal court may
set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(6) (a) That portion of a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be levied
at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant to KRS
107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the voters of
that county, levied by an action of a county fiscal court which will produce
revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more
than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall be subject to a recall vote
or reconsideration by the taxing district, as provided for in KRS 132.017, and
shall be advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The county fiscal court shall, within seven (7) days following adoption of an
ordinance to levy a tax rate, excluding any special tax rate which may be
Page 7 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
levied at the request of a county community improvement district pursuant to
KRS 107.350 and 107.360, following a favorable vote upon a tax by the
voters of that county, which will produce revenue from real property,
exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more
than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, cause to be published, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the county fiscal court has adopted a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
Section 3. KRS 132.023 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No special purpose governmental entity shall levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate until the taxing district has complied with the provisions of
KRS 65A.110 and subsection (2) of this section.
(2) (a) A special purpose governmental entity proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate shall submit the proposed rate as required
by KRS 65A.110 and shall hold a public hearing to hear comments from the
public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing shall be held in the same
location where the governing body of the city or county where the largest
number of citizens served by the special purpose governmental entity reside
meets, and shall be held immediately before a regularly scheduled meeting of
Page 8 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
that governing body.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall advertise the hearing by
causing to be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days, nor more than twenty-one (21)[ten (10)] days, after the
day that the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property in the special purpose governmental entity, addressed to the property
owner at his residence or principal place of business as shown on the current
year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The special purpose
governmental entity may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
Page 9 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
(3) (a) That portion of a tax rate levied by an action of a special purpose
governmental entity which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive
of revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount
of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate shall be subject to a recall
vote or reconsideration by the special purpose governmental entity, as
provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided in
paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The special purpose governmental entity shall, within seven (7) days
following adoption of an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a tax
rate which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from
new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue
produced by the compensating tax rate, cause to be published, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the taxing district has adopted a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property, in excess of four percent (4%) over
the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate is subject
to recall; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county in which the special purpose governmental entity is located, with
a notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
Section 4. KRS 132.027 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No city or urban-county government shall levy a tax rate which exceeds the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 until the city or urban-county
government has complied with the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.
Page 10 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
(2) (a) Cities or urban-county governments proposing to levy a tax rate which
exceeds the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall hold a public
hearing to hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate.
The hearing shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district, or, in the
event the taxing district has no office, or the office is not suitable for a
hearing, the hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to
the geographic center of the district.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall advertise the hearing by causing to
be published at least twice in two (2) consecutive weeks, in the newspaper of
largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than
twelve (12) column inches, the following:
1. The tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue produced by
that rate;
2. The tax rate proposed for the current year and the revenue expected to
be produced by that rate;
3. The compensating tax rate and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21)[ten (10)] days after the
day the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained therein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
Page 11 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
property in the taxing district, addressed to the property owner at his residence
or principal place of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The taxing district may set
reasonable time limits for testimony.
(3) (a) That portion of a tax rate levied by an action of a city or urban-county
government which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of
revenue from new property, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of
revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall
be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by the taxing district, as provided
for in KRS 132.017, and shall be advertised as provided for in paragraph (b)
of this subsection.
(b) The city or urban-county government shall, within seven (7) days following
adoption of an ordinance to levy a tax rate which will produce revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property as defined in KRS
132.010, more than four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced
by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010, cause to be published,
in the newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type
advertisement of not less than twelve (12) column inches the following:
1. The fact that the city or urban-county government has adopted a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall, and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the taxing district is located, with a
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
Page 12 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
Section 5. KRS 160.470 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, no district board of
education shall levy a general tax rate which will produce more revenue,
exclusive of revenue from net assessment growth as defined in KRS 132.010,
than would be produced by application of the general tax rate that could have
been levied in the preceding year to the preceding year's assessment, except as
provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS 157.440.
(b) If an election is held as provided for in KRS 132.017 and the question should
fail, such failure shall not reduce the "...general tax rate that could have been
levied in the preceding year...," referred to in subsection (1)(a) of this section,
for purposes of computing the general tax rate for succeeding years.
In the event of a merger of school districts, the limitations contained in this section
shall be based upon the combined revenue of the merging districts, as computed
under the provisions of this section.
(2) No district board of education shall levy a general tax rate within the limits imposed
in subsection (1) of this section which respectively exceeds the compensating tax
rate defined in KRS 132.010, except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this
section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, until the district board of education has
complied with the provisions of subsection (7) of this section.
(3) Upon receipt of property assessments from the Department of Revenue, the
commissioner of education shall certify the following to each district board of
education:
(a) The general tax rate that a district board of education could levy under the
provisions of subsection (1) of this section, and the amount of revenue
expected to be produced;
(b) The compensating tax rate as defined in KRS 132.010 for a district's general
Page 13 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
tax rate the amount of revenue expected to be produced;
(c) The general tax rate which will produce, respectively, no more revenue from
real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, than four percent (4%)
over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in
KRS 132.010, and the amount of revenue expected to be produced.
(4) Upon completion of action on property assessment data, the Department of
Revenue shall submit certified property assessment data as required in KRS
133.125 to the chief state school officer.
(5) Within thirty (30) days after the district board of education has received its
assessment data, the rates levied shall be forwarded to the Kentucky Board of
Education for its approval or disapproval. The failure of the district board of
education to furnish the rates within the time prescribed shall not invalidate any
levy made thereafter.
(6) (a) Each district board of education shall, on or before January 31 of each
calendar year, formally and publicly examine detailed line item estimated
revenues and proposed expenditures for the subsequent fiscal year. On or
before May 30 of each calendar year, each district board of education shall
adopt a tentative working budget which shall include a minimum reserve of
two percent (2%) of the total budget.
(b) Each district board of education shall submit to the Kentucky Board of
Education no later than September 30, a close estimate or working budget
which shall conform to the administrative regulations prescribed by the
Kentucky Board of Education.
(7) (a) Except as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS
157.440, a district board of education proposing to levy a general tax rate
within the limits of subsection (1) of this section which exceed the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 shall hold a public hearing to
Page 14 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
hear comments from the public regarding the proposed tax rate. The hearing
shall be held in the principal office of the taxing district or, in the event the
taxing district has no office, or the office is not suitable for such a hearing, the
hearing shall be held in a suitable facility as near as possible to the geographic
center of the district.
(b) The district board of education shall advertise the hearing by causing the
following to be published at least twice for two (2) consecutive weeks, in the
newspaper of largest circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of
not less than twelve (12) column inches:
1. The general tax rate levied in the preceding year, and the revenue
produced by that rate;
2. The general tax rate for the current year, and the revenue expected to be
produced by that rate;
3. The compensating general tax rate, and the revenue expected from it;
4. The revenue expected from new property and personal property;
5. The general areas to which revenue in excess of the revenue produced in
the preceding year is to be allocated;
6. A time and place for the public hearing which shall be held not less than
seven (7) days nor more than twenty-one (21)[ten (10)] days after the
day that the second advertisement is published;
7. The purpose of the hearing; and
8. A statement to the effect that the General Assembly has required
publication of the advertisement and the information contained herein.
(c) In lieu of the two (2) published notices, a single notice containing the required
information may be sent by first-class mail to each person owning real
property, addressed to the property owner at his residence or principal place
of business as shown on the current year property tax roll.
Page 15 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public. All persons desiring to be heard shall
be given an opportunity to present oral testimony. The district board of
education may set reasonable time limits for testimony.
(8) (a) That portion of a general tax rate, except as provided in subsections (9) and
(10) of this section, KRS 157.440, and KRS 157.621, levied by an action of a
district board of education which will produce, respectively, revenue from real
property, exclusive of revenue from new property, more than four percent
(4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate
defined in KRS 132.010, shall be subject to a recall vote or reconsideration by
the district board of education as provided for in KRS 132.017, and shall be
advertised as provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The district board of education shall, within seven (7) days following adoption
of an ordinance, order, resolution, or motion to levy a general tax rate, except
as provided in subsections (9) and (10) of this section and KRS 157.440,
which will produce revenue from real property, exclusive of revenue from
new property as defined in KRS 132.010, more than four percent (4%) over
the amount of revenue produced by the compensating tax rate defined in KRS
132.010, cause the following to be published, in the newspaper of largest
circulation in the county, a display type advertisement of not less than twelve
(12) column inches:
1. The fact that the district board of education has adopted such a rate;
2. The fact that the part of the rate which will produce revenue from real
property, exclusive of new property as defined in KRS 132.010, in
excess of four percent (4%) over the amount of revenue produced by the
compensating tax rate defined in KRS 132.010 is subject to recall; and
3. The name, address, and telephone number of the county clerk of the
county or urban-county in which the school district is located, with a
Page 16 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 368/GA
notation to the effect that that official can provide the necessary
information about the petition required to initiate recall of the tax rate.
(9) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, effective for school
years beginning after June 30, 1990, the board of education of each school
district shall levy a minimum equivalent tax rate of thirty cents ($0.30) for
general school purposes. Equivalent tax rate is defined as the rate which
results when the income collected during the prior year from all taxes levied
by the district for school purposes is divided by the total assessed value of
property plus the assessment for motor vehicles certified by the Department of
Revenue. School districts collecting school taxes authorized by KRS 160.593
to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.633, or 160.635 to 160.648 for less than twelve
(12) months during a school year shall have included in income collected
under this section the pro rata tax collection for twelve (12) months.
(b) Failure of a board to comply with paragraph (a) of this subsection may
constitute a forfeiture of office by its members pursuant to KRS 415.050 and
415.060.
(10) A district board of education may levy a general tax rate that will produce revenue
from real property, exclusive of revenue from new property, that is four percent
(4%) over the amount of the revenue produced by the compensating tax rate as
defined in KRS 132.010.
Page 17 of 17
HB036810.100 - 1205 - XXXX 2/26/2025 5:20 PM GA